Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1,126
General penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of the Livestock Brand Act is guilty of a Class II misdemeanor unless another penalty is specifically provided for such violation.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 57.